Hawaii, session 2026, GM1338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 302A-405, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended as follows:
3 1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
4 "(a) The price for school meals shall be set by the
5 department to ensure that moneys received from the sale of the
6 meals shall be not less than [efte—one-quarter of the cost
7 of preparing the meals. The prices for school meals may be
8 adjusted annually based on the previous year's costs rounded to
9 the nearest five cents; provided that the department by rule
10 shall provide a lower rate or free meals to children based on
11 their economic need."
12 2. By amending subsection (c) to read:
13 "(c) It is the intent of this section not to jeopardize
14 the receipt of any federal aid and to the extent, and only to
15 the extent necessary to effectuate this intent, the governor may
16 modify the strict provisions of this section, but shall promptly
17 report [any "sueh] the modification with the governor's reasons
HB2296 SD2 LRB 26-1243.docx
IIIIIMIBHWIIIIIIIIMIIIIII

Page 2
H.B. NO. ""
1 therefor to the next succeeding session of the legislature for
2 review."
3 SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
4 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
5 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
HB2296 SD2 LRB 26-1243.docx 2
iiiiiiiiiiinfflniiniiiiiii

H.B. NO. ""
APPROVED this 13th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2296, HD 1,SD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 24, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 2296, H.D. 1,S.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3676